Hawaii statutes.
[§342P-32] Other powers of
department not affected. The powers, duties, and functions vested in the
department under this chapter shall not be construed to affect in any manner
the powers, duties, and functions vested in the department under any other law.
[L 1991, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next